District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That
this act may be cited as the "Surveillance Pricing Prohibition Amendment Act of 2026".
Sec. 2. Chapter 39 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:


(a) Section 28-3901 is amended by adding new paragraphs (16) and (17) to read as
follows:
“(16) “Surveillance-based price discrimination” means using personally
identifiable information collected through electronic surveillance technology, technological
methods, systems, or tools, including sensors, cameras, device tracking, biometric monitoring,
or other forms of observation or data collection capable of gathering personally identifiable
information about a consumer’s behavior, characteristics, location, or other personal attributes,
whether in physical or digital environments, to set the price assessed for a good or service.
“(17) "Personally identifiable information" means information that can be used
to distinguish or trace an individual's identity, either alone or when combined with other
personal or identifying information that is linked or linkable to a specific individual.”.
(b) Section 28-3904 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (kk) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(2) Subsection (ll) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “;
or” in its place.
(3) A new subsection (mm) is added to read as follows:
“(mm) Engage in surveillance-based price discrimination to differentiate prices
assessed to a customer for a good or a service.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).